src/fst/affixes/enclitics.lexc
LEXICON A_Le
a+Prep#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Sg: # ;
a+Prep#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Masc+Obl+Dir+Unstress: # ;
a+Prep#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Neut+Obl+Unstress: # ;

a+Prep#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Sg: # ;
a+Prep#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Masc+Obl+Dir+Unstress: # ;
a+Prep#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Neut+Obl+Unstress: # ;

LEXICON A_Les
a+Prep#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Pl: # ;
a+Prep#le+Art+Def+Fem+Nom+Pl: # ;
a+Prep#le+Art+Def+Fem+Obl+Pl: # ;

LEXICON De_Le
de+Prep#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Sg: # ;
de+Prep#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Masc+Obl+Dir+Unstress: # ;
de+Prep#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Neut+Obl+Unstress: # ;

LEXICON De_Les
de+Prep#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Pl: # ;
de+Prep#le+Art+Def+Fem+Nom+Pl: # ;
de+Prep#le+Art+Def+Fem+Obl+Pl: # ;

LEXICON En_Le
en+Prep#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Sg: # ;
en+Prep#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Masc+Obl+Dir+Unstress: # ;
en+Prep#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Neut+Obl+Unstress: # ;

en+Pro+Adv#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Sg: # ;
en+Pro+Adv#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Masc+Obl+Dir+Unstress: # ;
en+Pro+Adv#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Neut+Obl+Unstress: # ;

LEXICON En_Les
en+Prep#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Pl: # ;
en+Prep#le+Art+Def+Fem+Nom+Pl: # ;
en+Prep#le+Art+Def+Fem+Obl+Pl: # ;

en+Pro+Adv#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Pl: # ;
en+Pro+Adv#le+Art+Def+Fem+Nom+Pl: # ;
en+Pro+Adv#le+Art+Def+Fem+Obl+Pl: # ;

LEXICON Ja_Le
je+Pro+Prs+1s+Nom+Stress+Err/Obsc#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Sg: # ;
je+Pro+Prs+1s+Nom+Stress+Err/Obsc#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Masc+Obl+Dir+Unstress: # ;
je+Pro+Prs+1s+Nom+Stress+Err/Obsc#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Neut+Obl+Unstress: # ;

LEXICON Ja_Me
je+Pro+Prs+1s+Nom+Stress+Err/Obsc#je+Pro+Prs+1s+Obl+Unstress: # ;

LEXICON Je_Le
je+Pro+Prs+1s+Nom+Stress+Gram/Late#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Sg: # ;
je+Pro+Prs+1s+Nom+Stress+Gram/Late#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Masc+Obl+Dir+Unstress: # ;
je+Pro+Prs+1s+Nom+Stress+Gram/Late#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Neut+Obl+Unstress: # ;

LEXICON Je_Les
je+Pro+Prs+1s+Nom+Stress+Gram/Late#le+Art+Def+Fem+Nom+Pl: # ;
je+Pro+Prs+1s+Nom+Stress+Gram/Late#le+Art+Def+Fem+Obl+Pl: # ;
je+Pro+Prs+1s+Nom+Stress+Gram/Late#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Pl: # ;

LEXICON Je_Me
je+Pro+Prs+1s+Nom+Stress+Gram/Late#je+Pro+Prs+1s+Obl+Unstress: # ;

LEXICON Jo_Le
je+Pro+Prs+1s+Nom+Stress+Gram/Early#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Sg: # ;
je+Pro+Prs+1s+Nom+Stress+Gram/Early#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Masc+Obl+Dir+Unstress: # ;
je+Pro+Prs+1s+Nom+Stress+Gram/Early#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Neut+Obl+Unstress: # ;

LEXICON Jo_Les
je+Pro+Prs+1s+Nom+Stress+Gram/Early#le+Art+Def+Fem+Nom+Pl: # ;
je+Pro+Prs+1s+Nom+Stress+Gram/Early#le+Art+Def+Fem+Obl+Pl: # ;
je+Pro+Prs+1s+Nom+Stress+Gram/Early#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Pl: # ;

LEXICON Tu_Le
tu+Pro+Prs+2s+Nom+Stress#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Sg: # ;
tu+Pro+Prs+2s+Nom+Stress#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Masc+Obl+Dir+Unstress: # ;
tu+Pro+Prs+2s+Nom+Stress#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Neut+Obl+Unstress: # ;

tu+Pro+Prs+2s+Nom+Unstress#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Sg: # ;
tu+Pro+Prs+2s+Nom+Unstress#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Masc+Obl+Dir+Unstress: # ;
tu+Pro+Prs+2s+Nom+Unstress#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Neut+Obl+Unstress: # ;

LEXICON Tu_Me
tu+Pro+Prs+2s+Nom+Stress#je+Pro+Prs+1s+Obl+Unstress: # ;
tu+Pro+Prs+2s+Nom+Unstress#je+Pro+Prs+1s+Obl+Unstress: # ;

LEXICON Lui_En
il+Pro+Prs+3s+Masc+Obl+Stress#en+Prep: # ;
il+Pro+Prs+3s+Masc+Obl+Stress#en+Pro+Adv: # ;

LEXICON Ne_Le
ne+Conj+Coord#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Sg: # ;
ne+Conj+Coord#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Masc+Obl+Dir+Unstress: # ;
ne+Conj+Coord#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Neut+Obl+Unstress: # ;

ne+Adv+Neg+Unstress#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Sg: # ;
ne+Adv+Neg+Unstress#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Masc+Obl+Dir+Unstress: # ;
ne+Adv+Neg+Unstress#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Neut+Obl+Unstress: # ;

LEXICON Ne_Les
ne+Conj+Coord#le+Art+Def+Fem+Nom+Pl: # ;
ne+Conj+Coord#le+Art+Def+Fem+Obl+Pl: # ;
ne+Conj+Coord#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Pl: # ;
ne+Adv+Neg+Unstress#le+Art+Def+Fem+Nom+Pl: # ;
ne+Adv+Neg+Unstress#le+Art+Def+Fem+Obl+Pl: # ;
ne+Adv+Neg+Unstress#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Pl: # ;

LEXICON Ne_Me
ne+Conj+Coord#je+Pro+Prs+1s+Obl+Unstress: # ;
ne+Adv+Neg+Unstress#je+Pro+Prs+1s+Obl+Unstress: # ;

LEXICON Ne_Te
ne+Conj+Coord#tu+Pro+Prs+2s+Obl+Unstress: # ;
ne+Adv+Neg+Unstress#tu+Pro+Prs+2s+Obl+Unstress: # ;

LEXICON Ne_Se
ne+Conj+Coord#se+Pro+Prs+3s+Refl+Unstress: # ;
ne+Adv+Neg+Unstress#se+Pro+Prs+3s+Refl+Obl+Unstress: # ;
ne+Conj+Coord#se+Conj+Subord: # ;
ne+Adv+Neg+Unstress#se+Conj+Subord: # ;
ne+Conj+Coord#se+Pro+Prs+3p+Refl+Unstress: # ;
ne+Adv+Neg+Unstress#se+Pro+Prs+3p+Refl+Obl+Unstress: # ;

LEXICON Qui_Le
que+Pro+Relative+Gram/Person+Nom#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Sg: # ;
que+Pro+Relative+Gram/Person+Nom#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Masc+Obl+Dir+Unstress: # ;
que+Pro+Relative+Gram/Person+Nom#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Neut+Obl+Unstress: # ;

que+Pro+Relative+Gram/Thing+Nom#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Sg: # ;
que+Pro+Relative+Gram/Thing+Nom#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Masc+Obl+Dir+Unstress: # ;
que+Pro+Relative+Gram/Thing+Nom#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Neut+Obl+Unstress: # ;

quoi+Pro+Interr+Gram/Person+Nom#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Sg: # ;
quoi+Pro+Interr+Gram/Person+Nom#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Masc+Obl+Dir+Unstress: # ;
quoi+Pro+Interr+Gram/Person+Nom#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Neut+Obl+Unstress: # ;

quoi+Pro+Interr+Gram/Thing+Nom#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Sg: # ;
quoi+Pro+Interr+Gram/Thing+Nom#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Masc+Obl+Dir+Unstress: # ;
quoi+Pro+Interr+Gram/Thing+Nom#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Neut+Obl+Unstress: # ;

LEXICON Qui_Les ! Check these forms
que+Pro+Relative+Gram/Person+Nom#le+Art+Def+Fem+Nom+Pl: # ;
que+Pro+Relative+Gram/Thing+Nom#le+Art+Def+Fem+Nom+Pl: # ;
quoi+Pro+Interr+Gram/Person+Nom#le+Art+Def+Fem+Nom+Pl: # ;
quoi+Pro+Interr+Gram/Thing+Nom#le+Art+Def+Fem+Nom+Pl: # ;

que+Pro+Relative+Gram/Person+Nom#le+Art+Def+Fem+Obl+Pl: # ;
que+Pro+Relative+Gram/Thing+Nom#le+Art+Def+Fem+Obl+Pl: # ;
quoi+Pro+Interr+Gram/Person+Nom#le+Art+Def+Fem+Obl+Pl: # ;
quoi+Pro+Interr+Gram/Thing+Nom#le+Art+Def+Fem+Obl+Pl: # ;

que+Pro+Relative+Gram/Person+Nom#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Pl: # ;
que+Pro+Relative+Gram/Thing+Nom#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Pl: # ;
quoi+Pro+Interr+Gram/Person+Nom#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Pl: # ;
quoi+Pro+Interr+Gram/Thing+Nom#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Pl: # ;

LEXICON Qui_Me
que+Pro+Relative+Gram/Person+Nom#je+Pro+Prs+1s+Obl+Unstress: # ;
que+Pro+Relative+Gram/Thing+Nom#je+Pro+Prs+1s+Obl+Unstress: # ;
quoi+Pro+Interr+Gram/Person+Nom#je+Pro+Prs+1s+Obl+Unstress: # ;
quoi+Pro+Interr+Gram/Thing+Nom#je+Pro+Prs+1s+Obl+Unstress: # ;

LEXICON Qui_Se
que+Pro+Relative+Gram/Person+Nom#se+Conj+Subord: # ;
que+Pro+Relative+Gram/Thing+Nom#se+Conj+Subord: # ;
quoi+Pro+Interr+Gram/Person+Nom#se+Conj+Subord: # ;
quoi+Pro+Interr+Gram/Thing+Nom#se+Conj+Subord: # ;

que+Pro+Relative+Gram/Person+Nom#se+Pro+Prs+3s+Refl+Obl+Unstress: # ;
que+Pro+Relative+Gram/Thing+Nom#se+Pro+Prs+3s+Refl+Obl+Unstress: # ;
quoi+Pro+Interr+Gram/Person+Nom#se+Pro+Prs+3s+Refl+Obl+Unstress: # ;
quoi+Pro+Interr+Gram/Thing+Nom#se+Pro+Prs+3s+Refl+Obl+Unstress: # ;

que+Pro+Relative+Gram/Person+Nom#se+Pro+Prs+3p+Refl+Obl+Unstress: # ;
que+Pro+Relative+Gram/Thing+Nom#se+Pro+Prs+3p+Refl+Obl+Unstress: # ;
quoi+Pro+Interr+Gram/Person+Nom#se+Pro+Prs+3p+Refl+Obl+Unstress: # ;
quoi+Pro+Interr+Gram/Thing+Nom#se+Pro+Prs+3p+Refl+Obl+Unstress: # ;

LEXICON Qui_En
que+Pro+Relative+Gram/Person+Nom#en+Prep: # ;
que+Pro+Relative+Gram/Thing+Nom#en+Prep: # ;
quoi+Pro+Interr+Gram/Person+Nom#en+Prep: # ;
quoi+Pro+Interr+Gram/Thing+Nom#en+Prep: # ;

que+Pro+Relative+Gram/Person+Nom#en+Pro+Adv: # ;
que+Pro+Relative+Gram/Thing+Nom#en+Pro+Adv: # ;
quoi+Pro+Interr+Gram/Person+Nom#en+Pro+Adv: # ;
quoi+Pro+Interr+Gram/Thing+Nom#en+Pro+Adv: # ;

LEXICON Que_Le
que+Pro+Relative+Gram/Person+Obl+Dir+Unstress#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Sg: # ;
que+Pro+Relative+Gram/Person+Obl+Dir+Unstress#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Masc+Obl+Dir+Unstress: # ;
que+Pro+Relative+Gram/Person+Obl+Dir+Unstress#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Neut+Obl+Unstress: # ;

que+Pro+Relative+Gram/Thing+Obl+Dir+Unstress#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Sg: # ;
que+Pro+Relative+Gram/Thing+Obl+Dir+Unstress#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Masc+Obl+Dir+Unstress: # ;
que+Pro+Relative+Gram/Thing+Obl+Dir+Unstress#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Neut+Obl+Unstress: # ;

que+Pro+Relative+Neut+Nom#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Sg: # ;
que+Pro+Relative+Neut+Nom#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Masc+Obl+Dir+Unstress: # ;
que+Pro+Relative+Neut+Nom#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Neut+Obl+Unstress: # ;

que+Pro+Relative+Neut+Obl+Dir+Unstress#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Sg: # ;
que+Pro+Relative+Neut+Obl+Dir+Unstress#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Masc+Obl+Dir+Unstress: # ;
que+Pro+Relative+Neut+Obl+Dir+Unstress#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Neut+Obl+Unstress: # ;

quoi+Pro+Interr+Gram/Thing+Obl+Dir+Unstress#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Sg: # ;
quoi+Pro+Interr+Gram/Thing+Obl+Dir+Unstress#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Masc+Obl+Dir+Unstress: # ;
quoi+Pro+Interr+Gram/Thing+Obl+Dir+Unstress#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Neut+Obl+Unstress: # ;

quoi+Pro+Interr+Neut+Nom#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Sg: # ;
quoi+Pro+Interr+Neut+Nom#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Masc+Obl+Dir+Unstress: # ;
quoi+Pro+Interr+Neut+Nom#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Neut+Obl+Unstress: # ;

quoi+Pro+Interr+Neut+Obl+Dir+Unstress#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Sg: # ;
quoi+Pro+Interr+Neut+Obl+Dir+Unstress#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Masc+Obl+Dir+Unstress: # ;
quoi+Pro+Interr+Neut+Obl+Dir+Unstress#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Neut+Obl+Unstress: # ;


LEXICON Que_Se
que+Pro+Relative+Gram/Person+Obl+Dir+Unstress#se+Conj+Subord: # ;
que+Pro+Relative+Gram/Thing+Obl+Dir+Unstress#se+Conj+Subord: # ;
que+Pro+Relative+Neut+Nom#se+Conj+Subord: # ;
que+Pro+Relative+Neut+Obl+Dir+Unstress#se+Conj+Subord: # ;
quoi+Pro+Interr+Gram/Thing+Obl+Dir+Unstress#se+Conj+Subord: # ;
quoi+Pro+Interr+Neut+Nom#se+Conj+Subord: # ;
quoi+Pro+Interr+Neut+Obl+Dir+Unstress#se+Conj+Subord: # ;

que+Pro+Relative+Gram/Person+Obl+Dir+Unstress#se+Pro+Prs+3s+Refl+Obl+Unstress: # ;
que+Pro+Relative+Gram/Thing+Obl+Dir+Unstress#se+Pro+Prs+3s+Refl+Obl+Unstress: # ;
que+Pro+Relative+Neut+Nom#se+Pro+Prs+3s+Refl+Obl+Unstress: # ;
que+Pro+Relative+Neut+Obl+Dir+Unstress#se+Pro+Prs+3s+Refl+Obl+Unstress: # ;
quoi+Pro+Interr+Gram/Thing+Obl+Dir+Unstress#se+Pro+Prs+3s+Refl+Obl+Unstress: # ;
quoi+Pro+Interr+Neut+Nom#se+Pro+Prs+3s+Refl+Obl+Unstress: # ;
quoi+Pro+Interr+Neut+Obl+Dir+Unstress#se+Pro+Prs+3s+Refl+Obl+Unstress: # ;

que+Pro+Relative+Gram/Person+Obl+Dir+Unstress#se+Pro+Prs+3p+Refl+Obl+Unstress: # ;
que+Pro+Relative+Gram/Thing+Obl+Dir+Unstress#se+Pro+Prs+3p+Refl+Obl+Unstress: # ;
que+Pro+Relative+Neut+Nom#se+Pro+Prs+3p+Refl+Obl+Unstress: # ;
que+Pro+Relative+Neut+Obl+Dir+Unstress#se+Pro+Prs+3p+Refl+Obl+Unstress: # ;
quoi+Pro+Interr+Gram/Thing+Obl+Dir+Unstress#se+Pro+Prs+3p+Refl+Obl+Unstress: # ;
quoi+Pro+Interr+Neut+Nom#se+Pro+Prs+3p+Refl+Obl+Unstress: # ;
quoi+Pro+Interr+Neut+Obl+Dir+Unstress#se+Pro+Prs+3p+Refl+Obl+Unstress: # ;

LEXICON Si_Le
si+Conj+Coord#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Sg: # ;
si+Conj+Coord#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Masc+Obl+Dir+Unstress: # ;
si+Conj+Coord#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Neut+Obl+Unstress: # ;

si+Pro+Poss+3s+Masc+Nom+Pl+Unstress#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Sg: # ;
si+Pro+Poss+3s+Masc+Nom+Pl+Unstress#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Masc+Obl+Dir+Unstress: # ;
si+Pro+Poss+3s+Masc+Nom+Pl+Unstress#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Neut+Obl+Unstress: # ;

si+Adv#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Sg: # ;
si+Adv#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Masc+Obl+Dir+Unstress: # ;
si+Adv#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Neut+Obl+Unstress: # ;

si+Conj+MultiWordConj+Subord#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Sg: # ;
si+Conj+MultiWordConj+Subord#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Masc+Obl+Dir+Unstress: # ;
si+Conj+MultiWordConj+Subord#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Neut+Obl+Unstress: # ;


LEXICON Si_Les
si+Conj+Coord#le+Art+Def+Fem+Nom+Pl: # ;
si+Pro+Poss+3s+Masc+Nom+Pl+Unstress#le+Art+Def+Fem+Nom+Pl: # ;
si+Adv#le+Art+Def+Fem+Nom+Pl: # ;
si+Conj+MultiWordConj+Subord#le+Art+Def+Fem+Nom+Pl: # ;

si+Conj+Coord#le+Art+Def+Fem+Obl+Pl: # ;
si+Pro+Poss+3s+Masc+Nom+Pl+Unstress#le+Art+Def+Fem+Obl+Pl: # ;
si+Adv#le+Art+Def+Fem+Obl+Pl: # ;
si+Conj+MultiWordConj+Subord#le+Art+Def+Fem+Obl+Pl: # ;

si+Conj+Coord#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Pl: # ;
si+Pro+Poss+3s+Masc+Nom+Pl+Unstress#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Pl: # ;
si+Adv#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Pl: # ;
si+Conj+MultiWordConj+Subord#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Pl: # ;

LEXICON Si_Me
si+Conj+Coord#je+Pro+Prs+1s+Obl+Unstress: # ;
si+Pro+Poss+3s+Masc+Nom+Pl+Unstress#je+Pro+Prs+1s+Obl+Unstress: # ;
si+Adv#je+Pro+Prs+1s+Obl+Unstress: # ;
si+Conj+MultiWordConj+Subord#je+Pro+Prs+1s+Obl+Unstress: # ;
